Washington statutes.
RCW 35.02.130

Newly incorporated city or town—Effective date of incorporation—Powers during interim period—Terms of elected officers—First municipal election. (Effective until January 1, 2026.)

The city or town officially shall become incorporated at a date from one hundred eighty days to three hundred sixty days after the date of the election on the question of incorporation. An interim period shall exist between the time the newly elected officials have been elected and qualified and this official date of incorporation. During this interim period, the newly elected officials are authorized to adopt ordinances and resolutions which shall become effective on or after the official date of incorporation, and to enter into contracts and agreements to facilitate the transition to becoming a city or town and to ensure a continuation of governmental services after the official date of incorporation. Periods of time that would be required to elapse between the enactment and effective date of such ordinances, including but not limited to times for publication or for filing referendums, shall commence upon the date of such enactment as though the city or town were officially incorporated.

During this interim period, the city or town governing body may adopt rules establishing policies and procedures under the state environmental policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW, and may use these rules and procedures in making determinations under the state environmental policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW.

During this interim period, the newly formed city or town and its governing body shall be subject to the following as though the city or town were officially incorporated: RCW 4.24.470 relating to immunity; chapter 42.17A RCW relating to open government; chapter 42.56 RCW relating to public records; chapter 40.14 RCW relating to the preservation and disposition of public records; chapters 42.20 and 42.23 RCW relating to ethics and conflicts of interest; chapters 42.30 and * 42.32 RCW relating to open public meetings and minutes; RCW 35.22.288, 35.23.221, 35.27.300, 35A.12.160, as appropriate, and chapter 35A.65 RCW relating to the publication of notices and ordinances; RCW 35.21.875 and 35A.21.230 relating to the designation of an official newspaper; RCW 36.16.138 relating to liability insurance; RCW 35.22.620, 35.23.352, and 35A.40.210, as appropriate, and statutes referenced therein relating to public contracts and bidding; and chapter 39.34 RCW relating to interlocal cooperation. Tax anticipation or revenue anticipation notes or warrants and other short-term obligations may be issued and funds may be borrowed on the security of these instruments during this interim period, as provided in chapter 39.50 RCW. Funds also may be borrowed from federal, state, and other governmental agencies in the same manner as if the city or town were officially incorporated.

RCW 84.52.020 and 84.52.070 shall apply to the extent that they may be applicable, and the governing body of such city or town may take appropriate action by ordinance during the interim period to adopt the property tax levy for its first full calendar year following the interim period.

The governing body of the new city or town may acquire needed facilities, supplies, equipment, insurance, and staff during this interim period as if the city or town were in existence. An interim city manager or administrator, who shall have such administrative powers and duties as are delegated by the governing body, may be appointed to serve only until the official date of incorporation. After the official date of incorporation the governing body of such a new city organized under the council manager form of government may extend the appointment of such an interim manager or administrator with such limited powers as the governing body determines, for up to ninety days. This governing body may submit ballot propositions to the voters of the city or town to authorize taxes to be collected on or after the official date of incorporation, or authorize an annexation of the city or town by a fire protection district or library district to be effective immediately upon the effective date of the incorporation as a city or town.

The boundaries of a newly incorporated city or town shall be deemed to be established for purposes of RCW 84.09.030 on the date that the results of the initial election on the question of incorporation are certified or the first day of January following the date of this election if the newly incorporated city or town does not impose property taxes in the same year that the voters approve the incorporation.

The newly elected officials shall take office immediately upon their election and qualification with limited powers during this interim period as provided in this section. They shall acquire their full powers as of the official date of incorporation and shall continue in office until their successors are elected and qualified at the next general municipal election after the official date of incorporation: PROVIDED, That if the date of the next general municipal election is less than twelve months after the date of the first election of councilmembers, those initially elected councilmembers shall serve until their successors are elected and qualified at the next following general municipal election as provided in **RCW 29A.20.040. For purposes of this section, the general municipal election shall be the date on which city and town general elections are held throughout the state of Washington, pursuant to RCW 29A.04.330.

In any newly incorporated city that has adopted the council-manager form of government, the term of office of the mayor, during the interim period only, shall be set by the council, and thereafter shall be as provided by law.

The official date of incorporation shall be on a date from one hundred eighty to three hundred sixty days after the date of the election on the question of incorporation, as specified in a resolution adopted by the governing body during this interim period. A copy of the resolution shall be filed with the county legislative authority of the county in which all or the major portion of the newly incorporated city or town is located. If the governing body fails to adopt such a resolution, the official date of incorporation shall be three hundred sixty days after the date of the election on the question of incorporation. The county legislative authority of the county in which all or the major portion of the newly incorporated city or town is located shall file a notice with the county assessor that the city or town has been authorized to be incorporated immediately after the favorable results of the election on the question of incorporation have been certified. The county legislative authority shall file a notice with the secretary of state that the city or town is incorporated as of the official date of incorporation.

[ 2011 c 60 s 15; 2005 c 274 s 263; 1997 c 361 s 11; 1994 c 154 s 308; 1991 c 360 s 3; 1986 c 234 s 16; 1965 c 7 s 35.02.130. Prior: 1953 c 219 s 7; 1890 p 133 s 3, part; RRS s 8885, part.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) The only section in chapter 42.32 RCW, RCW 42.32.030, was recodified as RCW 42.30.035 pursuant to 2017 3rd sp.s. c 25 s 30.

**(2) RCW 29A.20.040 was recodified as RCW 29A.60.280 pursuant to 2013 c 11 s 93.

Effective date—2011 c 60: See RCW 42.17A.919.

Effective date—1994 c 154: See RCW 42.52.904.

Times for holding elections: RCW 29A.04.311 through 29A.04.330.

PDFRCW 35.02.130

Newly incorporated city or town—Effective date of incorporation—Powers during interim period—Terms of elected officers—First municipal election. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

The city or town officially shall become incorporated at a date from 180 days to 360 days after the date of the election on the question of incorporation. An interim period shall exist between the time the newly elected officials have been elected and qualified and this official date of incorporation. During this interim period, the newly elected officials are authorized to adopt ordinances and resolutions which shall become effective on or after the official date of incorporation, and to enter into contracts and agreements to facilitate the transition to becoming a city or town and to ensure a continuation of governmental services after the official date of incorporation. Periods of time that would be required to elapse between the enactment and effective date of such ordinances, including but not limited to times for publication or for filing referendums, shall commence upon the date of such enactment as though the city or town were officially incorporated.

During this interim period, the city or town governing body may adopt rules establishing policies and procedures under the state environmental policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW, and may use these rules and procedures in making determinations under the state environmental policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW.

During this interim period, the newly formed city or town and its governing body shall be subject to the following as though the city or town were officially incorporated: RCW 4.24.470 relating to immunity; Title 29B RCW relating to open government; chapter 42.56 RCW relating to public records; chapter 40.14 RCW relating to the preservation and disposition of public records; chapters 42.20 and 42.23 RCW relating to ethics and conflicts of interest; chapters 42.30 and * 42.32 RCW relating to open public meetings and minutes; RCW 35.22.288, 35.23.221, 35.27.300, 35A.12.160, as appropriate, and chapter 35A.65 RCW relating to the publication of notices and ordinances; RCW 35.21.875 and 35A.21.230 relating to the designation of an official newspaper; RCW 36.16.138 relating to liability insurance; RCW 35.22.620, 35.23.352, and 35A.40.210, as appropriate, and statutes referenced therein relating to public contracts and bidding; and chapter 39.34 RCW relating to interlocal cooperation. Tax anticipation or revenue anticipation notes or warrants and other short-term obligations may be issued and funds may be borrowed on the security of these instruments during this interim period, as provided in chapter 39.50 RCW. Funds also may be borrowed from federal, state, and other governmental agencies in the same manner as if the city or town were officially incorporated.

RCW 84.52.020 and 84.52.070 shall apply to the extent that they may be applicable, and the governing body of such city or town may take appropriate action by ordinance during the interim period to adopt the property tax levy for its first full calendar year following the interim period.

The governing body of the new city or town may acquire needed facilities, supplies, equipment, insurance, and staff during this interim period as if the city or town were in existence. An interim city manager or administrator, who shall have such administrative powers and duties as are delegated by the governing body, may be appointed to serve only until the official date of incorporation. After the official date of incorporation the governing body of such a new city organized under the council manager form of government may extend the appointment of such an interim manager or administrator with such limited powers as the governing body determines, for up to 90 days. This governing body may submit ballot propositions to the voters of the city or town to authorize taxes to be collected on or after the official date of incorporation, or authorize an annexation of the city or town by a fire protection district or library district to be effective immediately upon the effective date of the incorporation as a city or town.

The boundaries of a newly incorporated city or town shall be deemed to be established for purposes of RCW 84.09.030 on the date that the results of the initial election on the question of incorporation are certified or the first day of January following the date of this election if the newly incorporated city or town does not impose property taxes in the same year that the voters approve the incorporation.

The newly elected officials shall take office immediately upon their election and qualification with limited powers during this interim period as provided in this section. They shall acquire their full powers as of the official date of incorporation and shall continue in office until their successors are elected and qualified at the next general municipal election after the official date of incorporation: PROVIDED, That if the date of the next general municipal election is less than 12 months after the date of the first election of councilmembers, those initially elected councilmembers shall serve until their successors are elected and qualified at the next following general municipal election as provided in RCW 29A.60.280. For purposes of this section, the general municipal election shall be the date on which city and town general elections are held throughout the state of Washington, pursuant to RCW 29A.04.330.

In any newly incorporated city that has adopted the council-manager form of government, the term of office of the mayor, during the interim period only, shall be set by the council, and thereafter shall be as provided by law.

The official date of incorporation shall be on a date from 180 to 360 days after the date of the election on the question of incorporation, as specified in a resolution adopted by the governing body during this interim period. A copy of the resolution shall be filed with the county legislative authority of the county in which all or the major portion of the newly incorporated city or town is located. If the governing body fails to adopt such a resolution, the official date of incorporation shall be 360 days after the date of the election on the question of incorporation. The county legislative authority of the county in which all or the major portion of the newly incorporated city or town is located shall file a notice with the county assessor that the city or town has been authorized to be incorporated immediately after the favorable results of the election on the question of incorporation have been certified. The county legislative authority shall file a notice with the secretary of state that the city or town is incorporated as of the official date of incorporation.

[ 2024 c 164 s 509; 2011 c 60 s 15; 2005 c 274 s 263; 1997 c 361 s 11; 1994 c 154 s 308; 1991 c 360 s 3; 1986 c 234 s 16; 1965 c 7 s 35.02.130. Prior: 1953 c 219 s 7; 1890 p 133 s 3, part; RRS s 8885, part.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The only section in chapter 42.32 RCW, RCW 42.32.030, was recodified as RCW 42.30.035 pursuant to 2017 3rd sp.s. c 25 s 30.

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Effective date—2011 c 60: See note following RCW 29B.20.030.

Effective date—1994 c 154: See RCW 42.52.904.

Times for holding elections: RCW 29A.04.311 through 29A.04.330.